Hawaii statutes.
§138-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Automatic location identification"
means an enhanced 911 service capability that enables the automatic display of
information indicating the address or approximate geographic location of the
communication device used to place a 911 call.

"Automatic number identification"
means an enhanced 911 service capability that enables the automatic display of
the ten-digit telephone number or some other unique identifier of the device
from which a 911 call is placed.

"Board" means the enhanced 911 board
established under this chapter.

"Call" means any communication,
message, signal, or transmission.

"Commercial mobile radio service"
means commercial mobile radio service under sections 3(27) and 332(d) of the
Federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, Title 47 United States Code section 151
et seq., and the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993, Public Law 103-66,
August 10, 1993, 107 Stat. 312.

"Commercial mobile radio service
connection" means each active wireless telephone number assigned to a
commercial mobile radio service customer, including end-users of resellers
whose place of primary use is within the State.

"Communications service" means a
service capable of accessing, connecting with, or interfacing with a 911
system, by dialing, initializing, or otherwise activating the 911 system by
means of a local telephone device, commercial mobile radio service device,
Interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol device, indirect communication
through a service bureau or call relay service, such as alarm companies, or any
other means.

"Communications service connection"
means each telephone number or a device's unique identifier assigned to a
residential or commercial subscriber by a communications service provider,
without regard to technology deployed.

"Communications service provider"
means an entity that provides communications service to a subscriber.

"Database service provider" means a
service supplier who maintains and supplies or contracts to maintain and supply
an automatic information location database or master street address guide.

"Enhanced 911 fund" or
"fund" means the special fund established by section 138-3.

"Enhanced 911 service costs" means
all capital, nonrecurring, and recurring costs directly related to the
implementation, operation, and administration of enhanced 911 services.

"Interconnected Voice over Internet
Protocol" means a service that:

(1) Enables real-time, two-way voice communications;

(2) Requires a broadband connection from the user's
location;

(3) Requires internet protocol-compatible customer
premises equipment; and

(4) Permits users generally to receive calls that
originate on the public switched telephone network and to terminate calls to
the public switched telephone network.

"Interconnected Voice over Internet
Protocol service provider" means an entity that provides Interconnected
Voice over Internet Protocol service.

"911" means the digits, address,
internet protocol address, or other information used to access or initiate a
call to a public safety answering point.

"911 coordinator" means the person
designated to carry out the responsibilities of coordinating 911 services as
required in section 3(b) of the Wireless Communications and Public Safety Act
of 1999.

"911 service" or "universal
emergency number service" means public communications service that
provides service users with the ability to reach a public safety answering
point by accessing a 911 system.

"911 system" means an emergency
communications system that:

(1) Enables the user of a voice communications
service connection such as telephone, computer, or commercial mobile radio
service, Interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol service or a data
communications service connection that transmits data exclusively, such as text
messaging, to reach a public safety answering point by accessing 911, or via a
service/relay bureau or accessing a 911 system through some other means; and

(2) Provides enhanced 911 service.

"Prepaid connection" means the sale
of a communications service that is paid for in advance or sold in
predetermined units of which the number of units declines with use of the
services.

"Proprietary information" means
customer lists and other related information (including the number of
customers), technology descriptions, technical information, or trade secrets,
and the actual or developmental costs of enhanced 911 service that are
developed, produced, or received internally by a communications service provider
or by a provider's employees, directors, officers, or agents.

"Public safety agency" means a
functional division of the State or a county that provides or has authority to
provide, or a private entity contracted by a state or county agency that
provides, firefighting, law enforcement, ambulance, medical, or other emergency
services.

"Public safety answering point" means
the public safety agency that receives incoming 911 calls and dispatches
appropriate public safety agencies to respond to those calls.

"Reseller" means a person or entity
that purchases communications service from a communications service provider
for the purpose of reselling communications service to end-users. [L 2004, c
159, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 168, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 9, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next